src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
айык+A:а•йык A_  "selvä" ;
антагонистический+A:антагонисти•ческий A_  "antagonistinen" ;
атеистический+A:атеисти•ческий A_  "" ;
биологический+A:биологи•ческий A_  "biologinen" ;
ваштареш+A:ваштареш A-VS  "vastainen" ;
великий+A:вели•кий A_  "suuri" ;
вичияш+A:вичияш A-VS  "viisivuotias" ;
вичымбал+A:вичымбал A_  "Vjatkan takainen" ;
виш+A:виш A-VS  "avoin" ;
вияш+A:вияш A-VS  "suora" ;
волгата-ужарге+A:волгата•-ужа•р A-ATTR_  "vaaleanvihreä" ;
волгыдо-саре+A:во•лгыдо-са•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
волтымо+A:во•лтым%{оы%} A_  "" ;
вудака+A:вудака A-a/e  "(valo) himmeä" ;
вудака-ошо+A:вудака•-о•ш A-ATTR_  "" ;
вуйшовычан+A:вуйшовычан A_  "" ;
вӱр-йошкарге+A:вӱр-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "verenpunainen" ;
вӱрвузык+A:вӱрву•зык A_  "" ;
грамматикысе+A:грамма•тикыс%{еы%} A_  "" ;
диоптриян+A:диоптрия•н A_  "" ;
ерунда+A:ерунда A-a/e  "(jonnin)joutava" ;
ешартыш+A:ешартыш A-VS  "lisä-" ;
жалованиян+A:жалованиян A_  "" ;
идалыкаш+A:идалыкаш A-VS  "vuosi-" ;
икияш+A:икияш A-VS  "yksivuotias" ;
икмарда+A:икмарда• A_  "" ;
ияш+A:ияш A-VS  "-vuotias" ;
йолалыше+A:йола•лыш%{еы%} A_  "" ;
йорга+A:йорга A-a/e  "leikkisä" ;
йошкар-ужарге+A:йошка•р-ужа•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
йошкарге+A:йошка•р A-ATTR_  "punainen" ;
йошкарге-шеме+A:йошка•рге-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
йоҥыжмаш+A:йоҥыжмаш A-VS  "virheellinen" ;
йывыжа+A:йывыжа A-a/e  "sileä" ;
йыгыжтыш+A:йыгыжтыш A-VS  "kyllästyttävä" ;
йытыра+A:йытыра A-a/e  "kaunis" ;
йыҥгыран+A:йыҥгыра•н A_  "" ;
йӧрдымаш+A:йӧрдымаш A-VS  "sopimaton" ;
йӧршеш+A:йӧршеш A-VS  "täydellinen" ;
йӧрыктымӧ+A:йӧрыктым%{еы%} A_OLD-ORTH  "kaadettu" ;
йӱкшыктыш+A:йӱкшыктыш A-VS  "jäähdyttävä" ;
кандалге-йошкарге+A:канда•лге-йошкарг%{еы%} A_  "" ;
кандалге-йошкарге+A:канда•лге-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
кандалге-шеме+A:канда•лге-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
канде-шеме+A:ка•нде-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
каура+A:каура A-a/e  "särkyvä(inen)" ;
каҥга+A:каҥга A-a/e  "laiha" ;
кечывалвел-касвелысе+A+Err/Orth:кечывалве•л-касвелс%{еы%} A_  "" ;
кидпырыс+A:кидпырыс A-VS  "hemmoteltu" ;
киш+A:киш A-VS  "tungetteleva" ;
книга+A:книга A-a/e  "kirjallinen" ;
кокияш+A:кокияш A-VS  "kaksivuotinen" ;
колышаш+A:колышаш A-VS  "kuoleva" ;
колыштдымо+A:ко•лыштдым%{оы%} A_  "" ;
коптыра+A:коптыра A-a/e  "törkeä" ;
кочшаш+A:кочшаш A-VS  "syötäväksi tarkoitettu/kelpaava" ;
коя+A:коя A-a/e  "lihava" ;
крепдешиновый+A:крепдеши•новый A_  "" ;
кумда+A:кумда A-a/e  "leveä" ;
кумияш+A:кумияш A-VS  "kolmivuotinen" ;
кумыраш+A:кумыраш A-VS  "kopeekanarvoinen" ;
купышо+A:ку•пыш%{оы%} A_  "" ;
курымаш+A:курымаш A-VS  "(iän)ikuinen" ;
кыдалаш+A:кыдалаш A-VS  "keskimmäinen" ;
кыльгака+A:кыльгака A-a/e  "äitelä" ;
кына-йошкарге+A:кына•-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
кӧзмер+A:кӧзме•р A_  "" ;
кӧҥга+A:кӧҥга A-a/e  "(hevonen) hyppivä" ;
кӱлдымаш+A:кӱлдымаш A-VS  "tarpeeton" ;
кӱлеш+A:кӱлеш A-VS  "tarpeellinen" ;
кӱрен-саре+A:кӱре•н-са•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
кӱреналге-йошкарге+A:кӱрена•лге-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
кӱреналге-шеме+A:кӱрена•лге-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
кӱчемдыш+A:кӱчемдыш A-VS  "helposti kiintyvä" ;
лазга+A:лазга A-a/e  "leveälatvainen" ;
лай+A:лай A_  "" ;
лайка+A:лайка A-a/e  "äitelä" ;
ласка+A:ласка A-a/e  "lempeä" ;
латкокымшан+A:латкокымша•н A_  "" ;
лаштыра+A:лаштыра A-a/e  "tuuhea(lehväinen)" ;
лийдымаш+A:лийдымаш A-VS  "mahdoton" ;
лийшаш+A:лийшаш A-VS  "tuleva" ;
лиш+A:лиш A-VS  "läheinen" ;
лопка+A:лопка A-a/e  "leveä" ;
лорга+A:лорга A-a/e  "(ääni) karhea" ;
лудалге-ошо+A:луда•лге-о•ш A-ATTR_  "" ;
лукшаш+A:лукшаш A-VS  "poistettava" ;
лумалге-ошо+A:лума•лге-о•ш A-ATTR_  "" ;
лупшалтме+A:лупша•лтм%{еы%} A_  "" ;
луш+A:луш A-VS  "höllä" ;
лыжга+A:лыжга A-a/e  "verkkainen" ;
лӧчката+A:лӧчката A-a/e  "lihava" ;
лӱпката+A:лӱпката A-a/e  "kostea" ;
макаронан+A:макарона•н A_  "" ;
мама+A:мама A-a/e  "pöyheä" ;
марда+A:марда A-a/e  "keskinkertainen" ;
монополистский+A:монополи•стский A_  "" ;
мучката+A:мучката A-a/e  "lihava" ;
нарынчалге-йошкарге+A:нарынча•лге-йошка•рг%{еы%} A_  "" ;
нарынчалге-ошо+A:нарынча•лге-о•ш A-ATTR_  "" ;
нарынче-йошкарге+A:на•рынче-йошкар A-ATTR_  "" ;
нарынче-шеме+A:на•рынче-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
нугыдо-саре+A:ну•гыдо-са•р A-ATTR_  "tummankeltainen" ;
нугыдо-шеме+A:ну•гыдо-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
нужна+A:нужна A-a/e  "köyhä" ;
ныжылге+A:ны•жыл A-ATTR_  "pehmeä" ;
нылияш+A:нылияш A-VS  "neljävuotias" ;
нӧлтымӧ+A:нӧ•лтым%{ӧы%} A_  "" ;
олтышаш+A:олтышаш A-VS  "lämmitys-" ;
омыюа+A:омыюа A-a/e  "unenpöpperössä" ;
ончыктыше+A:ончыктыш%{еы%} A_  "näyttävä" ;
оньыш-лийдымаш+A:оньыш-лийдымаш A-VS  "toteutumaton" ;
ош-йошкарге+A:ош-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
ош-ужарге+A:ош-ужа•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
ошалге-саре+A:оша•лге-са•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
ошалге-шеме+A:оша•лге-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
пазарысе+A:пазарыс%{еы%} A_  "" ;
пальтка+A:пальтка A-a/e  "haalistunut" ;
пелияш+A:пелияш A-VS  "puolivuotinen" ;
пелторта+A:пелторта A-a/e  "typerä" ;
перкеан+A:перкеан A_  "säästäväinen" ;
посадский+A:поса•дский A_  "" ;
пуни+A:пуни A_  "laiha" ;
пурка+A:пурка A-a/e  "kuohkea" ;
пырля+A:пырля A-a/e  "yhteinen" ;
пытартыш+A:пытартыш A-VS  "viimeinen" ;
пычкемыш+A:пычкемыш A-VS  "pimeä" ;
пӱжвӱдысӧ+A:пӱжвӱдыс%{ӧы%} A_  "" ;
раш+A:раш A-VS  "selvä" ;
рокдымо+A:ро•кдым%{оы%} A_  "" ;
руш+A:руш A-VS  "venäjän" ;
рушла+A:рушла A-a/e  "venäläinen" ;
рӱдаҥ-саре+A:рӱда•ҥ-сар A-ATTR_  "" ;
саралге-йошкарге+A:сара•лге-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
саре+Hom2+A:сар A-ATTR_  "keltainen" ;
сарзаҥге+A:сарза•ҥг%{еы%} A_  "" ;
сонорный+A:соно•рный A_  "" ;
соҥга+A:соҥга A-a/e  "järjetön" ;
сурал-шеме+A:сура•л-ше•м A-ATTR_  "harmaanmusta" ;
суралге-ужарге+A:сура•лге-ужар A-ATTR_  "" ;
сурешке-йошкарге+A:суре•шке-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
суто-йошкарге+A:су•то-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
сымыстаршан+A:сымыстаршан A_  "" ;
таза+A:таза A-a/e  "terve" ;
талукаш+A:талукаш A-VS  "vuosi-" ;
таража+A:таража A-a/e  "hirveä" ;
таҥаш+A:таҥаш A-VS  "vertainen" ;
темышан+A:темышан A_  "" ;
теҥгеаш+A:теҥгеаш A-VS  "(yhden) ruplan" ;
тичмаш+A:тичмаш A-VS  "kokonainen" ;
толшаш+A:толшаш A-VS  "tuleva" ;
тореш+A:тореш A-VS  "poikittainen" ;
торка+A:торка A-a/e  "leveälatvuksinen" ;
тран+A:тран A_  "" ;
тул-йошкарге+A:тул-йошкар A-ATTR_  "" ;
тура+A:тура A-a/e  "jyrkkä" ;
тылзаш+A:тылзаш A-VS  "kuukausi-" ;
тырме-торме+A:тырме-торм%{еы%} A_  "(hyvin) tuuhea" ;
тыртыш+A:тыртыш A-VS  "pyöreä" ;
тӱкалге-ошо+A:тӱка•лге-о•ш A-ATTR_  "kellertävänvalkoinen" ;
тӱшкасе+A:тӱшка•с%{еы%} A_  "" ;
тӱҥалтыш+A:тӱҥалтыш A-VS  "alkeis-" ;
ува+A:ува A-a/e  "harmaanruskea" ;
ужар-шеме+A:ужа•р-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
ужарге+A:ужар A-ATTR_  "vihreä" ;
ужарге-шеме+A:ужа•рге-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
унчеш+A:унчеш A-VS  "(ihminen) kummallinen" ;
ургызылык+A:у•ргызылык A_  "räätälin-" ;
чажгата+A:чажгата A-a/e  "järeä" ;
чал-шеме+A:чал-ше•м A-ATTR_  "" ;
чамыл+A:ча•мыл A_  "" ;
чарга+A:чарга A-a/e  "kimeä" ;
чевер-йошкарге+A:чеве•р-йошка•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
чевер-ужарге+A:чеве•р-ужа•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
чиста+A:чиста A-a/e  "siisti" ;
чолга+A:чолга A-a/e  "kirkas" ;
чувар-оҥан+A:чувар-оҥан A_  "" ;
чумыраш+A:чумыраш A-VS  "pyöreä" ;
чурката+A:чурката A-a/e  "kulmikas" ;
чышт-ошо+A:чышт-о•ш A-ATTR_  "" ;
чӱҥ-шеме+A:чӱҥ-ше•м%{еы%} A-ATTR_  "musta" ;
шапалге-ужарге+A:шапа•лге-ужа•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
шарлака+A:шарлака A-a/e  "(astia yms.) iso" ;
шем-йошкарге+A:шем-йошка•рг%{еы%} A_  "" ;
шем-ошо+A:шем-о•ш A-ATTR_  "" ;
шем-ужарге+A:шем-ужа•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
шемалге-саре+A:шема•лге-са•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
шеме+A:шем A-ATTR_  "musta" ;
шиялге-ошо+A:шия•лге-о•ш A-ATTR_  "hopeahkon valkoinen" ;
шолдыра+A:шолдыра A-a/e  "suuri" ;
шоналтыманрак+A:шоналтыманра•к A_  "" ;
шопка-саре+A:шопка•-са•р A-ATTR_  "" ;
шушаш+A:шушаш A-VS  "tuleva" ;
шуысо+A:шуыс%{оы%} A_  "" ;
шыма+A:шыма A-a/e  "hellä" ;
шӱчаҥше+A:шӱча•ҥш%{еы%} A_  "" ;
шӱштыра+A:шӱштыра A-a/e  "höllä" ;
эрвел+A:эрвел A/S  "itäinen A/S" ;
эҥертыман+A:эҥертыма•н A_  "" ;
южгата+A:южгата A-a/e  "kylmähkö" ;
яжар+A:яжар A/S  "(puhek.) irstas A/S" ;
якте+A:якт%{еы%} A/S  "mäntyinen A/S" ;
янда+A:янда A/S-a/e  "lasinen A/S" ;
яндар-ошо+A:янда•р-о•ш A-ATTR_  "" ;
яра+A:яра A-a/e  "tyhjä" ;
ӧрза+A:ӧрза A-a/e  "sininen" ;
ӧрыктарышан+A:ӧрыктарыша•н A_  "" ;
ӱдырамаш+A:ӱдырамаш A/S-VS  "naispuolinen A/S" ;
ӱлыл+A:ӱлыл A/S  "ala- A/S" ;
